Hawaii, session 2025, HB1163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-236, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  No person shall be issued a commercial driver's license unless that person: (1)  Meets the qualification standards of title 49 Code of Federal Regulations, part 391, subparts B and E; (2)  Has passed a knowledge and driving skills test for driving a commercial motor vehicle that complies with minimum federal standards established by federal regulation enumerated in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations, part 383, subparts G and H; (3)  [Is domiciled in the State as defined in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations, part 383.5;] Provides to the State proof of citizenship or lawful permanent residency as specified in table 1 to title 49 Code of Federal Regulations, section 383.71, as amended October 14, 2021, or obtains a non-domiciled commercial learner's permit or non-domiciled commercial driver's license as provided in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations, section 383.71(f), that shall be issued as a limited-term commercial learner's permit and limited-term commercial driver's license; and (4)  Has satisfied all other requirements of the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, Public Law 99-570, title XII, in addition to other requirements imposed by state law or federal regulation. The tests shall be prescribed by the director and administered by the respective county examiner of drivers.  The test examiners shall communicate with the applicant only in English during the skills test.  As of January 30, 2012, the examiner of drivers shall verify that the medical certification status of a driver who self-certified according to title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 383.71(b)(1)(i), non-excepted interstate, is certified.  If a driver submits a current medical examiner's certificate, the examiner of drivers shall date-stamp the certificate and post all required information to the commercial driver's license information system pursuant to title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 383.73(b)(5) and in accordance with title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 383.73(o).  A person who is not physically qualified to drive under title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 391.41(b)(1) or (2) and who is otherwise qualified to drive a motor vehicle may be granted an intrastate waiver by the director.  The process for granting intrastate waivers shall be the same as that for interstate waivers in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 391.49; provided that the intrastate waiver requests shall be submitted to the director." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.